Utah statutes.
17-21-1.   Recorder -- Document custody responsibility -- Electronic submission procedures and guidelines.

The county recorder:

(1)  is custodian of all recorded documents and records required by law to be recorded; 

(2)  shall establish policies and procedures that the recorder considers necessary to protect recorded documents and records in the recorder's custody, including determining the appropriate method for the public to obtain copies of the public record under Section 17-21-19 and supervision of those who search and make copies of the public record; and

(3)  may establish procedures and guidelines to govern the electronic submission of plats, records, and other documents to the county recorder's office consistent with Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

